Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 41.2 Alteration of Electronic Equipment — Serial Numbers

11-41.2-1.
Definitions.

“Alter” means to change or remove any identification number affixed by the maker or owner of equipment described in this chapter.

“Electronic equipment” means any television receiver, radio receiver, transmitter, transceiver, tuner, amplifier, speaker, earphone, video recorder or playback device, audio recorder or playback device, mobile telephone, computer, or accessory having an identification number unique to the item of equipment.

“Identification number” means any number or letter-number combination, unique to the specific item of equipment, engraved or embossed on the equipment by either the maker or owner of the equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 233, § 1.

11-41.2-2.
Alteration of identification numbers.

Any person who shall alter the identification number of any item of electronic equipment as defined in this chapter shall, upon conviction, be sentenced as follows:

If the value of the property exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both;

If the value of the property does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 233, § 1.

11-41.2-3.
Possession of electronic equipment with altered identification numbers.

Any person who shall knowingly be in possession of any item of electronic equipment as defined in this chapter with altered identification numbers shall, upon conviction, be sentenced as follows:

If the value of the property exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both;

If the value of the property does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 233, § 1.